District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-945

Severability of provisions.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 490, ch. 397, § 45
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-945.
1981 Ed., § 29-1145.
1973 Ed., § 29-845.

Prior Codifications